Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0217.
people of the state of michigan enact: 1 2 3 4 CHAPTER XVII Sec. 12e. This chapter applies to the following felonies enumerated in sections 601 to 624b of chapter VI of the Michigan vehicle code, 1949 PA 300, within chapter 257 of the Michigan 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Compiled Laws: M.C.L. Category Class Description Stat Max 257.601b(3) Person C Moving violation causing death to another person in a work zone or a school bus zone 15 257.601c(2) Person E Moving violation causing serious injury to vulnerable roadway user or operator of implement of husbandry 5 257.601c(2) 257.601c(3) Person CD Moving violation causing death to operator of implement of husbandry vulnerable roadway user 1510 257.601c(4) Person C Moving violation causing death to operator of implement of husbandry 15 257.602a(2) Pub saf G Fourth degree fleeing and eluding 2 257.602a(3) Pub saf E Third degree fleeing and eluding 5 257.602a(4) Person D Second degree fleeing and eluding 10 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 257.602a(5) Person C First degree fleeing and eluding 15 257.616a(2)(b) Pub saf G Using a signal preemption device 2 257.616a(2)(c) Pub saf E Using a signal preemption device causing a traffic accident 5 257.616a(2)(d) Person D Using a signal preemption device causing serious impairment of a body function 10 257.616a(2)(e) Person C Using a signal preemption device causing death 15 257.616a(2)(f) Pub ord G Selling or purchasing a signal preemption device 2 257.617(2) Person E Failure to stop at scene of accident resulting in serious impairment or death 5 257.617(3) Person C Failure to stop at scene of accident resulting in death when at fault 15 Enacting section 1. This amendatory act takes effect 90 days after the date it is enacted into law. 1 2 3 Enacting section 2. This amendatory act does not take effect unless Senate Bill No. 216 of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.